District of Columbia statutes.
11-521

Appointment of Auditor.

For so long as the business of the court may require, the United States District Court for the District of Columbia may appoint an Auditor for the court.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 478, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Court administration, Chief Judge of District of Columbia Court of Appeals, responsibilities and authority, see § 11-1702.
1981 Ed., § 11-521.
1973 Ed., § 11-521.